it: Casa e giardino > Piscine e spa > Accessori piscina e spa: Trampolini da piscina; Generatori di cloro per piscine e spa; Filtri piscine e spa; Kit per la manutenzione di piscine e spa; Allarmi per piscina; Spazzole e scope per piscine; Tubi per pulizia piscina; Detergenti e soluzioni piscine; Accessori per copri-piscine; Coperture e teli per piscine; Kit per bordo piscina; Materassini/poltrone galleggianti piscina; Riscaldatori per piscine; Scalette e scivoli per piscine; Luci della piscina; Rivestimenti per piscine; Fermascorie piscine; Scope piscina; Termometri per piscina; Giocattoli piscina; Scivoli da piscina
ru: Дом и сад > Бассейны и джакузи > Аксессуары для бассейнов и джакузи: Трамплины для прыжков в воду; Хлоргенераторы для бассейнов и джакузи; Фильтры для бассейнов и джакузи; Наборы для обслуживания бассейнов и джакузи; Сигнализация для бассейна; Щетки для бассейнов; Шланги для чистки бассейнов; Чистящие средства и химия для бассейнов; Аксессуары для накрытий для бассейнов; Накрытия и подложки для бассейнов; Наборы настилов для бассейнов; Надувные матрасы и кресла для бассейнов; Водонагреватели для бассейнов; Лестницы, ступеньки и пандусы для бассейнов; Освещение бассейна; Лайнеры для бассейнов; Скиммеры для бассейнов; Пылесосы для бассейнов; Термометры для бассейнов; Игрушки и игры для бассейнов; Горки для бассейнов
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Piscina e spa > Acessórios para piscinas e spa: Trampolins para piscinas; Geradores de cloro para piscinas e spa; Filtros para piscina e spa; Kits para manutenção de piscinas e spas; Alarmes para piscina; Escovas e vassouras para piscina; Mangueiras para piscina; Limpadores e produtos químicos para piscinas; Acessórios para cobertura de piscinas; Capas para piscina e plástico para forrar chão; Kits para deck de piscina; Cadeiras e sofás para piscina; Aquecedores de piscina; Escadas, degraus e rampas para piscina; Iluminação para piscina; Revestimentos para piscina; Peneiras para limpeza de piscinas; Varredores e aspiradores para piscina; Termômetros para piscina; Brinquedos para piscina; Tobogãs para piscina
hu: Otthon és kert > Medence és fürdő > Medence- és fürdőkiegészítők: Ugródeszkák; Medence és fürdő klórgenerátorok; Medence- és fürdőszűrők; Medence- és fürdőkarbantartási készletek; Medenceriasztók; Medencekefék és seprűk; Medencetisztító tömlők; Medencetisztítók és vegyszerek; Medencetakaró-kiegészítők; Medencetakarók és talajtakarók; Medencefedélzeti készletek; Medence-úszók és -nyugágyak; Medencefűtők; Medence-létrák, -lépcsők és -rámpák; Medencevilágítás; Medence-bélések; Medence-szűrők; Medence-seprők és -porszívók; Medencehőmérők; Medence-játékok; Medence-vízicsúszdák
en: Home & Garden > Pool & Spa > Pool & Spa Accessories: Diving Boards; Pool & Spa Chlorine Generators; Pool & Spa Filters; Pool & Spa Maintenance Kits; Pool Alarms; Pool Brushes & Brooms; Pool Cleaner Hoses; Pool Cleaners & Chemicals; Pool Cover Accessories; Pool Covers & Ground Cloths; Pool Deck Kits; Pool Floats & Loungers; Pool Heaters; Pool Ladders, Steps & Ramps; Pool Lights; Pool Liners; Pool Skimmers; Pool Sweeps & Vacuums; Pool Thermometers; Pool Toys; Pool Water Slides
th: บ้านและสวน > สระว่ายน้ำและสปา > อุปกรณ์สระว่ายน้ำและสปา: กระดานกระโดดน้ำ; เครื่องสร้างคลอรีนสำหรับสระว่ายน้ำและสปา; ตัวกรองสำหรับสระว่ายน้ำและสปา; ชุดบำรุงรักษาสระว่ายน้ำและสปา; สัญญาณเตือนภัยสระว่ายน้ำ; แปรงทำความสะอาดสระว่ายน้ำ; สายที่ทำความสะอาดสระว่ายน้ำ; สารเคมีทำความสะอาดสระว่ายน้ำ; อุปกรณ์คลุมสระว่ายน้ำ; ผ้าคลุมสระว่ายน้ำและผ้ารองพื้น; ชุดชานสระว่ายน้ำ; ที่นอนและแพยางเป่าลม; เครื่องทำความร้อนสำหรับสระว่ายน้ำ; บันไดและทางลาดสำหรับสระว่ายน้ำ; ไฟสระว่ายน้ำ; ไลเนอร์ปูสระว่ายน้ำ; สกิมเมอร์สระน้ำ; เครื่องดูดทำความสะอาดสระว่ายน้ำ; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์วัดอุณหภูมิสระว่ายน้ำ; ของเล่นสำหรับสระว่ายน้ำ; สไลด์สำหรับสระว่ายน้ำ
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Piscina e spa > Acessórios de piscina e spa: Pranchas de mergulho; Geradores de cloro para piscina e spa; Filtros para piscina e spa; Kits de manutenção para piscina e spa; Alarmes de piscina; Escovas e vassouras de piscina; Mangueiras de limpeza de piscina; Agentes de limpeza e químicos para piscina; Acessórios de cobertura de piscina; Coberturas de piscina e de pavimento; Kits para deck de piscina; Boias e colchões de piscina; Aquecedores de piscina; Escadas, degraus e rampas de piscina; Luzes de piscina; Revestimentos de piscina; Escumadores de piscina; Varredores e aspiradores de piscina; Termómetros de piscina; Brinquedos de piscina; Escorregas de piscina
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Bazeni i toplice > Oprema za bazen i toplice: Odskočne daske; Generatori klora za bazene i toplice; Filtri za bazene i toplice; Kompleti za održavanje bazena i toplica; Alarmi za bazene; Četke i metle za bazen; Crijeva za čišćenje bazena; Kemikalije i sredstva za čišćenje za bazena; Oprema za pokrivanje bazena; Pokrivači i podloge za bazen; Palube za bazen; Luftići i ležaljke za bazen; Grijači za bazen; Ljestve, stepeništa i rampe za bazen; Svjetla za bazen; Obloge za bazen; Skimeri za bazen; Čistači i usisavači za bazen; Termometri za bazene; Igračke za bazen; Tobogani za bazen
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Басейн и спа > Аксесоари за басейн и спа: Трамплин за скачане в басейн; Генератори на хлор за басейни и спа; Филтри за басейн и спа; Комплекти за поддръжка на басейни и спа; Аларми за басейни; Четки и метли за басейн; Маркучи за почистване на басейни; Почистващи препарати и химикали за басейни; Аксесоари за покривала за басейни; Покривала и подложки за басейни; Комплекти за площта около басейна; Плувни играчки и шезлонги за басейн; Нагреватели за басейни; Стълби, стъпала и рампи за басейн; Осветление за басейн; Облицовки за басейни; Скимери за басейн; Машини за почистване на басейни и прахосмукачки за басейни; Термометри за басейн; Играчки за басейн; Водни пързалки за басейн
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Bazeni in kopališča > Dodatki za bazene in kopališča: Odskočne deske; Generatorji klora za bazene in kopališča; Filtri za bazene in kopališča; Kompleti za vzdrževanje bazenov in kopališč; Alarmi za bazene; Krtače in metle za bazene; Cevi za čiščenje bazenov; Čistila in kemikalije za bazene; Dodatki za pokrivala za bazene; Pokrivala in talne podloge za bazene; Kompleti bazenskih ploščadi; Plavalne blazine in ležalniki za bazene; Grelniki za bazen; Lestve, stopnice in klančine za bazen; Luči za bazene; Obloge za bazene; Pripomočki za čiščenje bazena; Roboti in sesalniki za čiščenje bazena; Termometri za bazene; Igrače za bazen; Vodni tobogani za bazen
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Uima-allas ja spa > Uima-allas- ja spa-tarvikkeet: Ponnahduslaudat; Uima-altaan ja span kloorinkehittimet; Allas- ja spa-suodattimet; Allas- ja spa-hoitosetit; Uima-altaan hälytyslaitteet; Allasharjat; Altaan puhdistusletkut; Altaan puhdistusaineet ja -kemikaalit; Uima-altaan peitteiden lisätarvikkeet; Uima-altaan peitteet ja pohjakankaat; Uima-allaskatesetit; Uima-altaan uima- ja kelluntapatjat; Altaanlämmittimet; Uima-altaan tikkaat, portaat ja rampit; Uima-altaan valot; Uima-altaan reunustukset; Uima-altaan pintakaivot; Uima-altaa lakaisu- ja imurointilaitteet; Uima-allaslämpömittarit; Uima-allaslelut; Uima-altaan liukumäet
nb: Hjem og hage > Basseng og spa > Tilbehør for basseng og spa: Stupebrett; Klorgeneratorer for basseng og spa; Basseng- og spafiltre; Vedlikeholdssett for basseng og spa; Bassengalarmer; Bassengbørster og -koster; Rengjøringsslanger for bassenger; Bassengrengjøring og kjemikalier; Tilbehør til bassengtrekk; Bassengtrekk og jorddekker; Bassengsett; Flytemadrasser og bassengstoler; Bassengvarmere; Bassengstiger, -trapper og -ramper; Bassenglys; Bassenginnlegg; Bassengskimmere; Bassengrensere og -sugere; Bassengtermometre; Bassengleker; Vannsklier for bassenger
pl: Dom i ogród > Baseny i spa > Akcesoria do basenów i spa: Trampoliny basenowe; Generatory chloru do basenów; Filtry do basenów i spa; Zestawy do utrzymania basenów i spa; Alarmy basenowe; Szczotki do basenów; Węże czyszczące do basenów; Środki czystości i chemikalia do basenów; Akcesoria do pokryw basenowych; Osłony do basenów i maty pod baseny; Obrzeża basenów; Zabawki dmuchane i leżaki do basenów; Podgrzewacze basenów; Drabinki, schodki i podesty basenowe; Oświetlenie basenowe; Folie basenowe; Odpływy basenowe; Odkurzacze i szczotki basenowe; Termometry basenowe; Zabawki na basen; Zjeżdżalnie wodne
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Piscină și spa > Accesorii pentru piscină și spa: Trambuline; Generatoare de clor pentru piscină și spa; Filtre pentru piscină și spa; Seturi de întreținere pentru piscină și spa; Alarme pentru piscină; Perii și mături pentru piscină; Furtunuri pentru curățarea piscinei; Produse și produse chimice pentru curățarea piscinelor; Accesorii pentru acoperirea piscinei; Prelate pentru piscină și prelate pentru sol; Seturi pentru terase cu piscină; Accesorii plutitoare și șezlonguri pentru piscină; Încălzitoare pentru piscină; Scări, trepte și rampe pentru piscină; Lumini pentru piscină; Inserții piscină; Colector deșeuri pentru piscină; Mături și aspiratoare pentru piscine; Termometre pentru piscină; Jucării pentru piscină; Tobogane de apă pentru piscină
sv: Hem och trädgård > Pool och spa > Pool- och spatillbehör: Svikter; Klor för pool och spaanläggning; Pool- och spafilter; Underhållssatser för pooler och spabad; Poollarm; Poolborstar; Poolrengöringsslangar; Poolrengöringsmedel och -kemikalier; Tillbehör för poolskydd; Poolskydd; Pooldäckskit; Badmadrasser och flytfåtöljer; Poolvärmare; Poolstegar; Poolbelysning; Klädnad för poolens insida; Poolskimmers; Pooldammsugare och poolrengöring; Pooltermometrar; Poolleksaker; Vattenrutschkanor till pooler
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Baseinai ir SPA > Baseinų ir SPA priedai: Nardymo lentos; Baseinų ir SPA chloro generatoriai; Baseinų ir SPA filtrai; Baseinų ir SPA priežiūros rinkiniai; Baseino signalizacijos; Baseinų šepečiai ir šluotos; Baseinų valymo žarnos; Baseinų valikliai ir cheminės medžiagos; Baseinų dangos priedai; Baseino dangos ir patiesalai; Baseinų aplinkos rinkiniai; Pripučiami čiužiniai ir gultai baseinams; Baseinų šildytuvai; Baseinų kopėtėlės, laipteliai ir rampos; Baseino apšvietimas; Baseinų įtiesalai; Baseinų skimeriai; Baseinų valymo įrenginiai ir siurbliai; Baseinų termometrai; Baseinų žaislai; Baseinų vandens čiuožyklos
cs: Dům a zahrada > Bazény a lázně > Bazény a lázně – příslušenství: Skákací prkna; Dávkovací systémy pro bazény a lázně; Filtry pro bazény a lázně; Sady pro údržbu bazénů; Bazénové alarmy; Kartáče na čištění bazénů; Hadice na čištění bazénu; Čisticí prostředky a saponáty na čištění bazénů; Příslušenství pro zastřešení bazénů; Kryty na bazény a plachty pod bazény; Bazénové terasy; Bazénová lehátka a matrace; Vytápění bazénů; Bazénové žebříky a schodiště; Bazénová světla; Ochranné povrchy do bazénů; Bazénové plováky; Bazénové stěrky; Teploměry do bazénu; Bazénové hračky; Skluzavky do bazénů
nl: Huis en tuin > Zwembaden en spa's > Accessoires voor zwembaden en spa's: Duikplanken; Chloorgenerators voor zwembaden en spa's; Zwembad- en spafilters; Onderhoudssets voor zwembaden en spa's; Zwembadalarmen; Zwembadborstels en -bezems; Slangen voor zwembadreiniging; Zwembadreinigers en -chemicaliën; Accessoires voor zwembadafdekkingen; Zwembadhoezen en grondkleden; Sets voor inbouwzwembaden; Opblaas- en ligbedden voor het zwembad; Zwembadverwarming; Zwembadladders, -trappen en -hellingbanen; Zwembadverlichting; Zwembadfolie; Skimmers voor het zwembad; Zwembadbezems en -zuigers; Zwembadthermometers; Zwembadspeelgoed; Waterglijbanen voor zwembaden
da: Hjem og have > Pool og spa > Pool og spa – tilbehør: Udspringsvipper; Klorgeneratorer til pool og spa; Pool og spa – filtre; Vedligeholdelsessæt til swimmingpools og spaer; Poolalarmer; Poolbørster; Pool – renseslanger; Pool – rengøring og kemikalier; Tilbehør til poolcovere; Poolovertræk og jordbetræk; Udstyr til swimmingpool; Flydere og hvilestole til swimmingpools; Pool – opvarmning; Poolstiger, -trin og -ramper; Poollys; Beklædning til swimmingpools; Pool – skumsamler; Pool – koste og støvsugere; Termometre til pools; Pool – legetøj; Pool – vandrutsjebaner
es: Casa y jardín > Piscina y spa > Accesorios para piscinas y jacuzzis: Plataformas de salto; Generadores de cloro para piscinas y baños; Filtros para piscinas y jacuzzis; Kits de mantenimiento de piscinas y jacuzzis; Alarmas para piscina; Cepillos para piscinas; Mangueras para limpiar piscinas; Limpieza y desinfección de piscinas; Accesorios para cubiertas de piscina; Cubiertas para piscina; Kits para terrazas con piscina; Colchonetas y flotadores para piscina; Climatizadores de piscina; Escaleras y rampas de piscina; Luces para piscina; Lonas para piscinas; Filtros y coladores; Limpiafondos y aspiradores para piscinas; Termómetros para piscina; Juguetes para piscinas; Toboganes acuáticos para piscinas
vi: Nhà và vườn > Bể bơi và spa > Phụ kiện bể bơi và spa: Ván nhún; Máy phát clo cho bể bơi và spa; Thiết bị lọc nước hồ bơi & bể chứa nước; Bộ dụng cụ bảo dưỡng bể bơi và spa; Chuông báo hồ bơi; Chổi cọ bể bơi; Ống làm sạch bể bơi; Hóa chất và chất vệ sinh bể bơi; Phụ kiện mái che bể bơi; Tấm phủ và lót hồ bơi; Bộ dùng cho sàn hồ bơi; Phao nổi & thư giãn trong bể bơi; Thiết bị làm nóng nước; Thang bể bơi; Đèn hồ bơi; Lớp lót bể bơi; Hộp thu nước mặt; Thiết bị vệ sinh hồ bơi; Nhiệt kế bể bơi; Đồ chơi bể bơi; Cầu trượt bể bơi
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Bazény a vírivky > Príslušenstvo pre bazény a vírivky: Odrazové dosky; Generátory chlóru pre bazény a vírivky; Filtre pre bazény a vírivky; Súpravy na údržbu bazénov a víriviek; Bazénové alarmy; Bazénové kefy a metly; Hadice na čistenie bazénov; Čistiace prostriedky a chémia do bazénov; Príslušenstvo pre zastrešenie bazénov; Plachty na bazény a podložky pod bazény; Súpravy pre bazénové terasy; Nafukovačky do bazéna a ležadlá pri bazéne; Ohrievače bazénov; Bazénové rebríky, schodíky a rampy; Bazénové osvetlenie; Bazénové podložky; Bazénové zberače nečistôt; Zariadenia na zametanie bazéna a bazénové vysávače; Bazénové teplomery; Hračky do bazéna; Bazénové tobogány
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 泳池/水疗 > 泳池/水疗配件: 跳水板; 泳池/温泉氯气发生器; 水池过滤器; 泳池/水疗池维护套装; 泳池警报器; 泳池刷/扫帚; 泳池清洁软管/吸污管; 泳池清洁剂/清洁化学品; 泳池罩配件; 水池盖; 泳池平台甲板套装; 水上浮床/躺椅; 泳池加热器; 泳池梯子/台阶/坡道; 泳池灯; 水池内壁/底板保护胶垫; 泳池除沫器; 水池吸污机; 泳池温度计; 泳池玩具; 泳池水滑梯
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 수영장/스파 > 수영장/스파 부대용품: 다이빙 보드; 수영장/스파 염소 생성기; 수영장/스파 필터; 수영장/스파 정비 키트; 수영장 경보 장치; 수영장 청소 브러시/빗자루; 수영장 청소 호스; 수영장 세정제/약품; 수영장 덮개 부대용품; 수영장 덮개/방수천; 수영장 덱 세트; 수영장용 튜브/공기 매트리스; 수영장 히터; 수영장 계단/경사대; 수영장 조명; 수영장 라이너; 수영장 수면 청소 장치; 풀 청소기/진공 청소기; 수영장 온도계; 수영장 완구; 수영장 슬라이드
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > プール・スパ > プール・スパ関連用品: 飛び板; プール/スパ用塩素発生装置; プール・スパ用浄水器; プール・スパ保守用品; プールアラーム; プール掃除用ブラシ; プール洗浄ホース; プール用洗浄剤; プール カバー用品; プールカバー・グランドクロス; プールデッキキット; プール用うき輪・フロート; プールヒーター; プール用はしご; プールライト; プールライナー; プールスキマー; プール清掃機; プール温度計; プール用おもちゃ; プール用滑り台
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Πισίνα & Spa > Αξεσουάρ πισίνας & σπα: Βατήρες; Γεννήτριες χλωρίου για πισίνα & σπα; Φίλτρα πισίνας & σπα; Κιτ συντήρησης πισίνας & σπα; Συναγερμοί πισίνας; Βούρτσες & Σκούπες πισίνας; Σωλήνες καθαρισμού πισίνας; Καθαριστικά & χημικά πισίνας; Αξεσουάρ καλύμματος πισίνας; Καλύμματα & προστατευτικά πισίνας; Σετ δαπέδων πισίνας; Φουσκωτά & ξαπλώστρες πισίνας; Θερμοσίφωνες πισίνας; Σκάλες, σκαλοπάτια & ράμπες πισίνας; Φωτισμός πισίνας; Επενδύσεις πισίνας; Μηχανήματα στράγγισης νερού πισίνας; Συσκευές σκουπίσματος & ηλεκτρικές σκούπες πισίνας; Θερμόμετρα πισίνας; Παιχνίδια πισίνας; Νεροτσουλήθρες πισίνας
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 泳池與 SPA > 泳池/SPA 配件: 跳水板; 泳池/SPA 鹽素機; 泳池/水療池過濾器; 泳池維護工具組; 泳池警報器; 泳池刷和水池刷; 泳池清洗軟管; 泳池清洗化學劑; 泳池保溫罩配件; 泳池蓋/草地蓋布; 泳池甲板套組; 泳池充氣用品/躺椅; 室外泳池恆溫器; 泳池階梯/斜坡; 泳池燈; 泳池膠膜; 泳池撇渣器; 水中吸塵器; 泳池溫度計; 戲水玩具; 滑水道
fr: Maison et jardin > Piscine et spa > Accessoires pour piscines et spas: Plongeoirs; Générateurs de chlore pour spas et piscines; Filtres pour piscines et spas; Kits d’entretien pour piscines et spas; Alarmes de piscine; Brosses et balais pour piscines; Tuyaux flottants pour piscines; Nettoyeurs de piscine et produits chimiques; Accessoires pour couvre-piscines; Bâches de piscines et tapis de sol; Kits pour terrasses de piscines; Fauteuils et matelas de piscine; Systèmes de chauffage pour piscines; Échelles, escaliers et rampes de piscine; Éclairage de piscine; Revêtements de piscine; Écumoires de piscine; Balais et aspirateurs de piscine; Thermomètres pour piscine; Jouets pour piscine; Toboggans de piscine
de: Heim & Garten > Pool & Spa > Pool- & Whirlpool-Zubehör: Sprungbretter; Chlorgeneratoren für Pools und Whirlpools; Pool- & Whirlpool-Filter; Wartungssets für Pools & Whirlpools; Poolalarmsysteme; Poolbürsten; Schläuche für Poolreiniger; Mechanische & Chemische Poolreiniger; Zubehör für Poolabdeckungen; Poolabdeckungen & -unterlagen; Sonnendecks; Badeinseln & Schwimmliegen; Swimmingpoolheizungen; Poolleitern, -treppen & -rampen; Poolbeleuchtung; Poolfolien; Poolskimmer; Poolreinigungsgeräte; Poolthermometer; Badespielzeug; Wasserrutschen
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Havuz ve Spa > Havuz ve Spa Aksesuarları: Atlama Tahtaları; Havuz ve Spa Klorin Jeneratörleri; Havuz ve Spa Filtreleri; Havuz ve Spa Bakım Teçhizatı; Havuz Alarmları; Havuz Fırçaları ve Süpürgeleri; Havuz Temizleme Hortumları; Havuz Temizlik Maddeleri ve Kimyasalları; Havuz Kapatma Aksesuarları; Havuz Brandaları ve Zemin Bezleri; Havuz Güvertesi Setleri; Havuz için Şişme Yataklar ve Şezlonglar; Havuz Isıtıcıları; Havuz Merdivenleri, Basamakları ve Rampaları; Havuz Işıkları; Havuz Kaplamaları; Havuz Kepçeleri; Havuz Süpürge ve Vakum Süpürgeleri; Havuz Termometreleri; Havuz Oyuncakları; Havuz Kaydırakları